Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 44 Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens
Subchapter 5

— Bonds

Cross References.

Contractors, §17-25-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1911, No. 446, § 8: effective 90 days after passage.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 9: approved Mar. 28, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “The construction and repair of public and private buildings being delayed and hampered because of the ambiguity in the statutory requirements for contractors' bonds, an emergency is declared to exist and the immediate operation of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety it shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1957, No. 209, § 6: approved Mar. 12, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “The construction and repair of private and public buildings and other public works being delayed and hampered because of the ambiguity in the statutory requirements for contractors' bonds, an emergency is declared to exist and the immediate operation of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety it shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1987, No. 757, § 3: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that because of the large volume of proposed construction by taxing agencies and the confusion that now exists on a large scale concerning the handling of Performance Bonds, to the detriment of contractors, subcontractors, the taxing agencies and the public, that the clarification made by this act is immediately needed to eliminate said confusion and resulting harmful effects on the public peace, health, safety and welfare. By reason thereof, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

18-44-501. Purpose.

The bond required or authorized in this subchapter shall in itself be a full compliance with all other statutes of this state in effect relating to bond requirements on contracts for the repair, alteration, or erection of any building, structure, or improvement, public or private, it being the intention of this subchapter to provide a uniform bonding procedure in conjunction with such contracts.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 4; 1957, No. 209, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-635.

Cross References.

Coverage of contractors' bonds, §22-9-401 et seq.

University buildings, construction, §6-62-301 et seq.

18-44-502. Exemption.

This subchapter shall not apply to any contract executed by the Arkansas Department of Transportation.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-638; Acts 2017, No. 707, § 40.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department”.

18-44-503. Public buildings and improvements.

(a)

A contract in a sum exceeding the amount stated in §22-9-203 providing for the repair, alteration, or erection of any public building, public structure, or public improvement shall not be entered into by the State of Arkansas or any subdivision of the state, by any county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit, or by any agency of the state, a subdivision of the state, a county, a municipality, a school district, or any other local taxing unit, unless the contractor shall furnish to the party letting the contract a bond in a sum equal to the amount of the contract.

(b)

All persons, firms, associations, and corporations who have valid claims against the bond may bring an action on the bond against the corporate surety, provided that no action shall be brought on the bond after twelve (12) months from the date on which the Building Authority Division or institutions exempt from construction review and approval by the division approve final payment on the state contract, nor shall any action be brought outside the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 1; 1957, No. 209, § 1; 1969, No. 468, § 1; 1979, No. 539, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-632; Acts 1987, No. 757, § 1; 2001, No. 961, § 2; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 8; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, §
8; 2019, No. 658, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6078.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “Services, or … approve” for “Services approves” in (b).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, in (b), substituted “the Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “the Arkansas Building Authority” and “the division” for “the authority”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 658, in (a), substituted “the amount stated in §22-9-203” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)”, substituted “the state, a subdivision of the state, a county, a municipality, a school district, or any other local taxing unit” for “any of the foregoing”, and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (b), deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

18-44-504. Construction by religious or charitable organizations.

(a)

No contract in any sum exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) providing for the repair, alteration, or erection of any building, structure, or improvement shall be entered into by any church, religious organization, charitable institution, or by any agency of the foregoing, unless the contractor shall furnish to the party letting the contract a bond in a sum equal to the amount of the contract.

(b)(1)

The bond shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the circuit court in the county in which the property is situated.

(2)

Any person or his or her assigns to whom there is due any sum for labor or material furnished may bring an action on the bond for the recovery of the indebtedness. No action shall be brought after six (6) months from the completion of the church, hospital, orphanage, charitable institution, or benevolent institution.

(3)

If the bond is not filed as provided in this subsection, any person performing labor or furnishing material, except the principal contractor, shall have a lien upon the property for the unpaid amount of the claim.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 446, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 6916; Pope's Dig., § 8875; Acts 1953, No. 351, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-631, 51-633.

18-44-505. Option for private construction.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association entering into a contract for the repair, alteration, or erection of any building, structure, or improvement may, at his or her or its option, require the contractor to furnish a bond in a sum equal to the amount of the contract.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-634.

18-44-506. Surety and conditions.

The bond required or authorized in this subchapter shall be executed by a solvent corporate surety company authorized to do business in the State of Arkansas. The bond shall be conditioned that the contractor shall faithfully perform his or her contract and shall pay all indebtedness for labor and materials furnished or performed in the repair, alteration, or erection.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 4; 1957, No. 209, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-635.

18-44-507. Filing.

Before any work is performed under the contract, the bond shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the repairs, alterations, or erection of any building, structure, or improvements are made.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-637.

18-44-508. Actions — Limitations.

(a)

All persons, firms, associations, and corporations who have valid claims against the bond may bring an action thereon against the corporate surety.

(b)

No action shall be brought on the bond after six (6) months from the date final payment is made on the contract, nor outside the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 351, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-636.

Cross References.

Actions on bonds, §16-107-201 et seq.

Parties.

Contractor was not a necessary party in suit. Holcomb v. American Sur. Co., 184 Ark. 449, 42 S.W.2d 765 (1931) (decision under prior law).

Cited:

United States v. Trigg, 465 F.2d 1264 (8th Cir. 1972).